Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.140

Insurance on buildings.

The director may, in his or her discretion, obtain fire or other hazard insurance on any building under his or her management.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5158; 1965 c 8 s 43.82.140. Prior: 1961 c 184 s 7.]